Nevada, session 83, AB355.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 387.333 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.333 1. The Fund to Assist School Districts in Financing
Capital Improvements is hereby created in the State Treasury, to be
administered by the Director of the Office of Finance. All money
received and held by the State Treasurer for the purpose of the Fund
must be deposited in the Fund.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The Director of the Office of Finance may accept gifts and
grants from any source for deposit in the Fund.
3. The money in the Fund must be invested as the money in
other state funds is invested. All interest and income earned on the
money in the Fund must be credited to the Fund.
4. Claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims against
the State are paid.
5. Any money remaining in the Fund at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Fund must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2. NRS 387.3341 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.3341 1. The Fund to Assist Rural School Districts in
Financing Capital Improvements is hereby created in the State
Treasury, to be administered by the Director of the Office of
Finance. All money received and held by the State Treasurer for the
purpose of the Fund must be deposited in the Fund.
2. The Director of the Office of Finance may accept gifts and
grants from any source for deposit in the Fund.
3. The money in the Fund must be invested as the money in
other state funds is invested. All interest and income earned on the
money in the Fund must be credited to the Fund.
4. Claims against the Fund must be paid as other claims against
the State are paid.
5. Money in the Fund must be used to make grants to school
districts in counties whose population is less than 100,000, for the
following purposes:
(a) Construction, design or purchase of new buildings for
schools, including, but not limited to, teacherages, dormitories,
dining halls, gymnasiums and stadiums.
(b) Enlarging, remodeling or repairing existing buildings or
grounds for schools, including, but not limited to, teacherages,
dormitories, dining halls, gymnasiums and stadiums.
(c) Acquiring sites for building schools, or additional real
property for necessary purposes related to schools, including, but
not limited to, playgrounds, athletic fields and sites for stadiums.
6. Any money remaining in the Fund at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Fund must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 387.3343 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.3343 1. Following any fiscal year in which a county
levies a tax imposed pursuant to NRS 387.3342, the board of
trustees of the school district in the county shall apply to the
Director of the Office of Finance for a grant of money from the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Fund created pursuant to NRS 387.3341 on a form provided by
the Director.
2. Following any fiscal year in which a county levies a tax
imposed pursuant to NRS 387.3289, the board of trustees of the
school district in the county may apply to the Director of the Office
of Finance for a grant of money from the Fund created pursuant to
NRS 387.3341 on a form provided by the Director.
3. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, the board
of trustees of a school district in a county whose population is less
than 100,000 may apply to the Director of the Office of Finance
for a grant of money from the Fund created pursuant to NRS
387.3341, on a form provided by the Director, in any fiscal year in
which the board of trustees:
(a) Receives a gift, grant or donation for a capital project of
the school district that is located on qualified tribal land; or
(b) Accrues interest on money received by the school district
for a capital project of the school district that is located on
qualified tribal land,
 or both.
4. The application for a grant of money from the Fund
submitted pursuant to this section must be accompanied by:
(a) A description of the capital project for which the grant is
requested, which must be a capital project described by subsection 5
of NRS 387.3341; and
(b) [Either:] As applicable:
(1) Documentation of the amount of the tax assessed
pursuant to NRS 387.3342 for the capital project for which the grant
is requested in the immediately preceding fiscal year; [or]
(2) A statement by the board of trustees of the school district
in a county which has levied a tax imposed pursuant to NRS
387.3289 certifying the amount of the proceeds of the tax imposed
pursuant to NRS 387.3289 for the immediately preceding fiscal year
which will be dedicated to the capital project [.
4.] ; or
(3) Documentation relating to the amount of the gift, grant,
donation or accrued interest.
5. To the extent that money is available for that purpose in the
Fund and if the Director of the Office of Finance determines that the
capital project for which the grant is requested is a project for which
a grant may be made from the Fund, the Director shall make a grant
of money from the Fund to a school district that submits an
application pursuant to [subsection 1 or 2] this section in an amount
that is equal to [:] , as applicable:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(a) The total amount of tax assessed by the county for the capital
project pursuant to NRS 387.3342 in the immediately preceding
fiscal year; [or]
(b) If the school district is located in a county which levies a tax
imposed pursuant to NRS 387.3289, the amount of the proceeds of
the tax imposed pursuant to NRS 387.3289 for the immediately
preceding fiscal year which the board of trustees of the school
district has certified will be dedicated to the capital project [.
5.] ; or
(c) One or both of the following:
(1) The gift, grant or donation made to the school district
for the capital project located on qualified tribal land.
(2) The interest accrued on money received by the school
district for the capital project on qualified tribal land.
6. The Director of the Office of Finance shall adopt regulations
that prescribe the annual deadline for submission of an application
to the Director by a school district pursuant to this section.
7. As used in this section, “qualified tribal land” means any
real property:
(a) For which legal title is vested in, or held in trust for the
benefit of, an Indian tribe or an individual Native American, and
which is subject to restrictions against alienation pursuant to
federal law; and
(b) Over which an Indian tribe exercises governmental power.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)